Hawaii statutes.
§132-5 Right of entry for inspection;
unlawful to obstruct. The county fire chief or the chief's designees, at
all reasonable hours may enter any buildings, structures, or premises within
the fire chief's jurisdiction, except the interior of private dwellings, to
make any inspection, investigation, or examination that is authorized to be
made under this chapter. The county fire chief or the chief's designees may
enter any private dwelling whenever the fire chief or the chief's designees
have reason to believe that dangerous conditions creating a fire hazard exist
in the dwelling. The county fire chief or the chief's designees may enter any
private dwelling when a fire has occurred in the dwelling. It shall be
unlawful to obstruct, hinder, or delay any person having the right to make the
inspection, investigation, or examination in the performance of duty.

The county fire chief or the chief's designees
are authorized to make an inspection of all buildings and facilities, except
state-owned airport facilities, the frequency of which shall be made in
accordance with section 132-6, and shall make a report to the authorities
responsible for the maintenance of any building or facility when it is found
that a building or facility does not meet minimum standards of fire and safety
protection. [L 1917, c 115, pt of §49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of
§6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(13); RL 1945, §8530; RL 1955, §184-6; am L 1959, c
114, §1; HRS §132-6; am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(6); gen ch 1985; am L 2001, c
6, §1; am L 2007, c 10, §2; am L 2009, c 105, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next